Arkansas, session 2025, HB1228.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. REGULAR SALARIES - OPERATIONS. There is hereby established
for the Northwest Arkansas Community College for the 2025-2026 fiscal year,
the following maximum number of regular employees.

Maximum Annual
Maximum Salary Rate
Item No. of Fiscal Year
No. Title Employees 2025-2026
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ADMINISTRATIVE POSITIONS
(1) President, NWACC 1 $208,138
(2) IT Pool 27
Network Engineer $200,973
Information Systems Manager $128,994
*HAR007*
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
Computer Network Coordinator $128,780
Technical Support Staff $123,019
Coordinator, Academic Computing $121,571
Coord., Administrative Computing $121,570
Coordinator of Information Technology $119,967
Website Developer/Programmer $119,967
System Programmer/Web Developer $118,592
Computer Systems Mgr. $108,987
Database Administrator $106,607
Systems Administrator $105,547
Information Systems Security Specialist $103,579
Institution Information Technology Coord. $101,489
Assistant Database Administrator $97,665
Computer Support Manager $97,585
Information Systems Coordinator $97,585
Senior Software Support Specialist $97,585
Systems Specialist $97,585
Information Technology Manager $96,408
Network Support Specialist $93,831
Senior Software Support Analyst $93,831
Tech Support/Systems Admin. $92,374
Tech Support/Applications Support $92,374
Information Systems Business Manager $90,223
Security Analyst $90,223
Systems Analyst $90,223
Information Technology Specialist $88,339
Computer Support Coordinator $86,753
Software Support Analyst $86,753
Systems Applications Supervisor $86,753
Computer Operations Coordinator $83,416
Systems Coordination Analyst $83,416
PC Support Specialist $81,860
Computer Support Specialist $80,208
Database Analyst $80,208
Digital Broadcast Specialist $77,123
Network Support Analyst $77,123
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
Website Developer $77,123
Information Systems Analyst $74,157
Information Systems Security Analyst $74,157
Computer Support Analyst $74,157
Software Support Specialist $71,305
Telecommunications Supervisor $71,305
Media Specialist $69,975
Computer Support Technician $68,562
Help Desk Specialist $68,562
Computer Operator $65,925
Network Analyst $65,925
Telecommunications Specialist $65,925
Multimedia Specialist $62,208
Information Technology Assistant $58,608
Computer Lab Technician $56,353
Multimedia Technician $51,130
Audiovisual Laboratory Assistant $47,272
(3) Executive Vice President 2 $174,282
(4) Chief Academic Officer 1 $167,057
(5) Chief of External & Adv. Programs 1 $156,658
(6) Chief Information Officer 1 $156,658
(7) Director of College Relations 1 $156,658
(8) Chief Fiscal Officer 1 $156,658
(9) Chief Planning & Assessment Officer 1 $156,658
(10) Chief Student Affairs Officer 1 $156,658
(11) Director of Institutional Research 1 $132,733
(12) Dir. of Community & Govt. Relations 1 $132,733
(13) Dir. of Fac. Planning & Construction 1 $132,733
(14) Director of Human Resources 1 $132,733
(15) Director of Administrative Services 1 $130,825
(16) Dean of Workforce Development 1 $129,825
(17) Counselor 11 $127,508
(18) Director 2 $127,507
(19) Coord. of Cont. Ed. & Bus. Outreach 1 $122,249
(20) Dir. of Public Relations & Marketing 1 $122,249
(21) Registrar 1 $122,249
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
(22) Director of Financial Aid 1 $122,005
(23) Dean of Students 1 $121,484
(24) Director of Major Gifts 1 $121,402
(25) Director of Planning & Assessment 1 $120,919
(26) Project/Program Administrator 37
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(27) Director of Academic Computing 1 $119,967
(28) Director of Administrative Computing 1 $119,967
(29) Director of Distance Learning 1 $119,881
(30) Director of Off-Campus Operations 1 $119,881
(31) Business Manager 1 $117,181
(32) Controller 1 $117,181
(33) Director of Testing Services 1 $114,690
(34) Director of Physical Plant 1 $113,103
(35) Director of Police & Public Safety 1 $113,102
(36) Director of Admissions 1 $111,453
(37) Director of Enrollment Management 1 $111,453
(38) Director of Academic Advising 1 $111,361
(39) Director of Student Retention 1 $111,361
(40) Director of Special Programs 1 $111,361
(41) Coordinator of Career Services 1 $106,609
(42) Associate Registrar 1 $106,166
(43) Instructional Designer 3 $106,084
(44) Administrator of Grants & Contracts 1 $103,501
(45) Assistant to the President 1 $103,501
(46) Dir. of Student Activities/Org. 1 $101,944
(47) Workforce Specialist 4 $93,055
(48) Fiscal Support Pool 11
Fiscal Support Manager $92,082
Fiscal Support Supervisor $75,685
Accountant II $72,774
Accountant I $69,975
Fiscal Support Analyst $67,284
Fiscal Support Specialist $59,815
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
Accounting Technician $55,302
Fiscal Support Technician $51,130
(49) Director of Disability Services 1 $91,268
(50) Public Safety Pool 23
HE Public Safety Commander III $90,223
Director Public Safety I $88,541
HE Public Safety Commander II $86,753
HE Public Safety Commander I $83,416
HE Public Safety Supervisor $74,157
Public Safety Officer $71,305
Public Safety Officer II $65,925
Security Officer Supervisor $62,208
Public Safety/Security Officer $56,353
HE Public Safety Dispatcher $47,272
Parking Control Supv. $47,272
Security Officer $47,272
Parking Control Officer $45,455
Watchman $38,855
(51) Accounting Coordinator 4 $85,136
(52) Planned Giving Officer 1 $85,080
(53) Procurement Coordinator 1 $78,713
(54) Benefits Coordinator 1 $78,713
(55) Budget Analyst 1 $78,713
(56) Academic Tutor 2 $77,184
(57) Academic Advisor 19 $77,184
(58) Student Services Representative 28 $77,183
(59) Skilled Trades Pool 7
Skilled Trades Foreman $74,157
Skilled Trades Supervisor $71,305
Skilled Tradesman $68,562
Skilled Trades Helper $52,101
Apprentice Tradesman $46,319
(60) Grants Analyst 2 $72,774
(61) Human Resources Analyst 2 $72,774
(62) Maintenance Coordinator 1 $72,774
(63) Production Artist 2 $72,774
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
(64) HEI Program Coordinator 21 $69,975
(65) Administrative Support Pool 64
Administrative Assistant $67,284
Administrative Analyst $67,284
Administrative Support Supervisor $62,208
Administrative Specialist III $59,815
Administration Support Specialist $59,815
Administrative Specialist II $53,175
Administrative Support Specialist $53,175
Administrative Specialist I $47,272
Extra Help Assistant $38,855
(66) Assistant Registrar 5 $67,284
(67) Construction Specialist 1 $67,284
(68) Financial Aid Analyst 5 $67,284
(69) Library Support Pool 4
Library Supervisor $67,284
Library Specialist $57,515
Library Technician $53,175
Library Support Assistant $49,164
(70) Purchasing Specialist 2 $67,284
(71) Financial Aid Specialist 1 $62,208
(72) Human Resources Specialist 1 $62,208
(73) Inventory Control Manager 1 $62,208
(74) Landscape Supervisor 1 $62,208
(75) Maintenance Specialist 3 $59,815
(76) Laboratory Coordinator 4 $57,515
(77) Human Resources Assistant 1 $55,302
(78) Student Account Specialist 1 $55,302
(79) Warehouse Specialist 1 $55,302
(80) Admission Specialist 1 $51,130
(81) Cashier 3 $51,130
(82) Maintenance Assistant 8 $51,130
(83) Mail Services Coordinator 1 $49,164
(84) Registrar's Assistant 2 $49,164
(85) Academic Laboratory Assistant 4 $45,455
(86) Equipment Operator 1 $45,455
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
TWELVE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(87) Division Chairperson/Dean 8 $146,201
(88) Director of Nursing 1 $144,651
(89) Librarian 1 $132,733
(90) Special Instructor 40 $111,362
(91) Assistant Librarian 8 $82,663
(92) Lab. Supervisor 6 $69,399
NINE MONTH EDUCATIONAL AND GENERAL
ACADEMIC POSITIONS
(93) Faculty 183 $111,362
(94) Part-Time Faculty 513 $56,046
TWELVE MONTH AUXILIARY ENTERPRISES
POSITIONS
(95) Athletic Director 1 $120,919
(96) Project/Program Administrator 1
Project/Program Director $120,919
Project/Program Manager $101,256
Project/Program Specialist $91,408
(97) Athletic Administration & Support Pool 7
Coach $104,891
Asst. Coach $56,046
Athletic Trainer $41,956
MAX. NO. OF EMPLOYEES 1,137

SECTION 2. EXTRA HELP - OPERATIONS. There is hereby authorized, for
the Northwest Arkansas Community College for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the
following maximum number of part-time or temporary employees, to be known as
"Extra Help", payable from funds appropriated herein for such purposes:
three hundred sixty (360) temporary or part-time employees, when needed, at
rates of pay not to exceed those provided in the Uniform Classification and
Compensation Act, or its successor, or this act for the appropriate
classification.

SECTION 3. APPROPRIATION - STATE OPERATIONS. There is hereby
appropriated, to the Northwest Arkansas Community College, to be payable from
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
the Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund, for personal services and
operating expenses of the Northwest Arkansas Community College for the fiscal
year ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $13,068,588
(02) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 10,000
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 0
(C) PROF. FEES 0
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(03) CONTINGENCY 653,929
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $13,732,517

SECTION 4. APPROPRIATION - CASH FUNDS. There is hereby appropriated,
to the Northwest Arkansas Community College, to be payable from cash funds as
defined by Arkansas Code 19-4-801, for personal services and operating
expenses of the Northwest Arkansas Community College for the fiscal year
ending June 30, 2026, the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $27,453,974
(02) EXTRA HELP 1,812,734
(03) OVERTIME 54,520
(04) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 19,000,501
(05) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 18,371,141
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 616,080
(C) PROF. FEES 2,090,855
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 3,878,233
(E) DATA PROC. 0
(06) CAPITAL IMPROVEMENTS 1,066,272
(07) DEBT SERVICE 4,046,275
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
(08) PROMOTIONAL ITEMS 89,111
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $78,479,696

SECTION 5. APPROPRIATION - CHILD PROTECTION TRAINING CENTER. There is
hereby appropriated, to the Northwest Arkansas Community College, to be
payable from the Northwest Arkansas Community College Fund, for personal
services and operating expenses of the Northwest Arkansas Community College -
Child Protection Training Center for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2026,
the following:

ITEM FISCAL YEAR
NO. 2025-2026
(01) REGULAR SALARIES $142,043
(02) PERSONAL SERVICES MATCHING 34,657
(03) MAINT. & GEN. OPERATION
(A) OPER. EXPENSE 51,250
(B) CONF. & TRAVEL 10,250
(C) PROF. FEES 35,875
(D) CAP. OUTLAY 0
(E) DATA PROC. 0
TOTAL AMOUNT APPROPRIATED $274,075

SECTION 6. COMPLIANCE WITH OTHER LAWS. Disbursement of funds
authorized by this act shall be limited to the appropriation for such agency
and funds made available by law for the support of such appropriations; and
the restrictions of the State Procurement Law, the General Accounting and
Budgetary Procedures Law, the Revenue Stabilization Law, the Regular Salary
Procedures and Restrictions Act, the Higher Education Expenditure Restriction
Act, or their successors, and other fiscal control laws of this State, where
applicable, and regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and
Administration, as authorized by law, shall be strictly complied with in
disbursement of said funds.

SECTION 7. LEGISLATIVE INTENT. It is the intent of the General
Assembly that any funds disbursed under the authority of the appropriations
contained in this act shall be in compliance with the stated reasons for
01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007

HB1228
which this act was adopted, as evidenced by the Agency Requests, Executive
Recommendations and Legislative Recommendations contained in the budget
manuals prepared by the Department of Finance and Administration, letters, or
summarized oral testimony in the official minutes of the Arkansas Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee which relate to its passage and adoption.

SECTION 8. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the General
Assembly, that the Constitution of the State of Arkansas prohibits the
appropriation of funds for more than a one (1) year period; that the
effectiveness of this Act on July 1, 2025 is essential to the operation of
the agency for which the appropriations in this Act are provided, and that in
the event of an extension of the legislative session, the delay in the
effective date of this Act beyond July 1, 2025 could work irreparable harm
upon the proper administration and provision of essential governmental
programs. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act
being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health
and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after July 1, 2025.



















01/27/2025 9:12:19 AM HAR007